Utah statutes.
76-6-1104.   Court records.

In any case in which a person commits identify fraud and uses the personal identifying information obtained to commit a crime in addition to the identity fraud, the court shall make appropriate findings in any prosecution of such a crime that the person whose identity was falsely used to commit the crime did not commit the crime.



Enacted by Chapter 57, 2000 General Session

